Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.102.110

Alternative route conditional scholarship program.

(1) The alternative route conditional scholarship program is created. The purpose of the program is to provide financial assistance to encourage persons to become teachers through alternative route teacher certification programs and to retain these teachers in shortage areas.

(2) To qualify for the program an applicant must:

(a) Be accepted into, and maintain enrollment in, an alternative route teacher certification program under chapter 28A.660 RCW; and

(b) Intend to pursue an initial teacher certificate with an endorsement in a shortage area.

(3) Participants are eligible to receive an alternative route conditional scholarship for up to two academic years.

[ 2019 c 295 s 217.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.